Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 4
ACCESS TO NONIDENTIFYING ADOPTION INFORMATION

19-5-401. Definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:
Entire part added, p. 655, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:
(4) amended, p. 2689, § 214, effective July 1.

L. 96:
Entire section repealed, p. 85, § 11, effective March 20.

Cross references:
For current applicable definitions, see § 19-1-103.

19-5-402. Access to nonidentifying information.

Any adult adoptee or any adoptive parent may request nonidentifying information about the adoptee or the birth parents of the adoptee from the department. The department shall provide directly to the inquiring adult adoptee or adoptive parent or to the
qualified agency selected pursuant to section 19-5-403 the nonidentifying information which is available to the department. The department shall adopt rules governing the disclosure of nonidentifying information.

Source:

L. 93:
Entire part added, p. 656, § 1, effective July 1.

19-5-403. Authority for department to select agencies.

The department is authorized to select private, licensed child placement agencies authorized to handle adoptions for the disclosure of nonidentifying information pursuant to this part 4. The department shall, by rule, establish qualifying criteria by
which the licensed child placement agencies authorized to handle adoptions shall be selected, which criteria shall include, but shall not be limited to, a requirement that the agencies maintain all information which identifies members
of the birth family strictly confidential.

Source:

L. 93:
Entire part added, p. 656, § 1, effective July 1.